Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 60. Emergency Small Business Jobs Stimulus Act

154.60-005.
Subchapter title.

This subchapter shall be known as the Small Business Tax Credit and Selling Farmer Tax Credit Programs.

History.
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 128, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 91, § 22, effective April 15, 2020.

154.60-010.
Definitions for subchapter.

As used in this subchapter:

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority;

“Average hourly wage” means the per-hour wage earned by a full-time employee, including wages, tips, overtime, bonuses, and commissions, as reflected on the employee’s federal form W-2 wage and tax statement.
(2) (a)

“Average hourly wage” means the per-hour wage earned by a full-time employee, including wages, tips, overtime, bonuses, and commissions, as reflected on the employee’s federal form W-2 wage and tax statement.

“Average hourly wage” does not include employee benefits as defined in KRS 154.32-010, including health insurance and reimbursements;

“Base employment” means:

For the first application for which credits are approved, the number of full-time employees employed on the day prior to the work start date of the new employee filling the earliest eligible position identified on the application;

For subsequent applications, the number of full-time employees employed on the day prior to the work start date of the new employee filling the earliest eligible position identified on the initial approved application plus each eligible position for which a credit has been approved; and

For applications from businesses involved in mergers, acquisitions, or federal tax identification number changes, base employment may be adjusted by the Cabinet for Economic Development;

“Eligible position” means each position that:

Is filled by a full-time employee and that increases the total employment of the small business above its base employment; and

Carries an average hourly wage of no less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage;

“Full-time employee” means a person employed by a small business for at least an average of thirty-five (35) hours per week and subject to the state tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

“Qualifying equipment or technology” means equipment or technology that has been approved by the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation; and

“Small business” means any business entity organized for profit that has been approved by the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation, including a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited liability company, joint venture, association, or cooperative, that has fifty (50) or fewer employees working more than thirty-five (35) hours per week, whether within or outside the Commonwealth, at the time it applies.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 65, effective June 26, 2009; 2010 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 11, effective June 4, 2010; 2014, ch. 128, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 35, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 76, § 4, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 185, § 128, effective June 29, 2021.

154.60-020.
Small Business Development Credit Program — Application requirements — Maximum credits permitted.

The authority shall develop a Small Business Development Credit Program in consultation with the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation to assist new or existing small businesses operating in the Commonwealth. The nonrefundable credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and 141.0401. The ordering of credits shall be as provided in KRS 141.0205.

The authority shall determine the terms, conditions, and requirements for application for the credit, in consultation with the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. The application shall contain identification information about the number of eligible positions created and filled, a calculation of the base employment of the small business, verification of investment of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more in qualifying equipment or technology, and other information the authority may specify to determine eligibility for the credit.

The maximum amount of credits that may be committed in each fiscal year by the authority and shared between the small business tax credit program and the Selling Farmer Tax Credit Program shall be capped at three million dollars ($3,000,000).
(3) (a)

The maximum amount of credits that may be committed in each fiscal year by the authority and shared between the small business tax credit program and the Selling Farmer Tax Credit Program shall be capped at three million dollars ($3,000,000).

In order to be eligible to receive final approval for a credit, a small business shall, within the twenty-four (24) month period immediately preceding the application submission date:

Create and fill one (1) or more eligible positions over the base employment; and

Invest five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more in qualifying equipment or technology.

Each eligible position that is created and filled shall be maintained for twelve (12) months. If a full-time employee filling a newly created eligible position ceases to be employed by the small business for any reason, that employee shall be replaced within forty-five (45) days in order for the eligible position to maintain its eligible status, in addition to meeting all other applicable requirements.

The small business shall submit all information necessary for the authority to determine credit eligibility for each year, and the amount of credit for which the small business is eligible.

The maximum amount of credit for each small business for each year shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

The credit shall be claimed on the tax return for the year during which the credit was approved. Unused credits may be carried forward for up to five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 66, effective June 26, 2009; 2010 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 12, effective June 4, 2010; 2014, ch. 128, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 36, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 172, § 6, effective March 26, 2019; 2020 ch. 91, § 23, effective April 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 185, § 129, effective June 29, 2021.

154.60-030.
Administrative regulations.

The authority shall establish the procedures and standards for a small business development credit program by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 67, effective June 26, 2009.

154.60-040.
Selling Farmer Tax Credit Program — Definitions — Purposes — Application requirements — Incentives offered to eligible companies under tax credit program to be negotiated by Cabinet for Economic Development and subject to approval by the authority — After approval of application, authority to transmit required information to the Department of Revenue — Beginning January 1, 2020, authority may approve selling farmer tax credit.

As used in this section:

“Agricultural assets” means:
(a) 1.

“Agricultural assets” means:

Agricultural land which has been appraised by an individual certified by the Real Estate Appraisers Board created under KRS 324A.015; and

Buildings, facilities, machinery, equipment, agricultural products, or horticultural products, if:

Owned by the same selling farmer owning the agricultural land sold to a beginning farmer;

Purchased at the same time and in the same transaction with the agricultural land; and

Purchased with the intent to be used on the purchased agricultural land.

“Agricultural assets” does not mean:

A personal residence or any other residential structures; and

Any agricultural assets that have been previously included in an approved application for the Kentucky selling farmer tax credit;

“Agricultural land” means:

Any land located entirely in Kentucky that is zoned or permitted for farming, if the jurisdiction where the land is located has enacted an ordinance for zoning or permitting; and

Is a tract of land of at least ten (10) contiguous acres in area for a farming operation for agricultural products; or
2. a.

Is a tract of land of at least ten (10) contiguous acres in area for a farming operation for agricultural products; or

Is a tract of land of at least five (5) contiguous acres in area for a farming operation for aquaculture or horticultural products; owned by the selling farmer prior to the sale;

“Agricultural products” means:

Livestock or livestock products;

Poultry or poultry products;

Milk or milk products; or

Field crops and other crops, including timber if approved by the authority;

“Aquaculture” means the farming of fish, crustaceans, mollusks, aquatic plants, algae, or other similar organisms;

“Farm product” means aquaculture, agricultural products, or horticultural products;

“Farming operation” means the management and operation of agricultural assets for the purpose of pursuing a profitable commercial business venture to produce agricultural products, horticultural products, or both for sale.
(f) 1.

“Farming operation” means the management and operation of agricultural assets for the purpose of pursuing a profitable commercial business venture to produce agricultural products, horticultural products, or both for sale.

“Farming operation” does not mean any:

Hobby farm, as determined by the Internal Revenue Service;

Nonprofit venture;

Farm used primarily for storing agricultural products or horticultural products; or

Farm used to grow or raise agricultural products or horticultural products primarily for use by the immediate family members or owners of the agricultural assets;

“Horticultural products” means orchards, fruits, vegetables, nuts, flowers, or ornamental plants; and

“Immediate family member” means any of the following in relation to any owner or spouse of the owner of the agricultural assets:

Parent or grandparent;

Children or their spouses; or

Siblings or their spouses.

Any incentive offered to an eligible company under the Selling Farmer Tax Credit Program shall be negotiated by Cabinet for Economic Development officials and shall be subject to approval by the authority.

The purpose of the Selling Farmer Tax Credit Program is to promote the continued use of agricultural land in Kentucky for farming purposes by granting a tax credit to a selling farmer who agrees to sell agricultural assets to a beginning farmer.

Selling farmers wanting to sell agricultural assets may be eligible for a tax credit up to five percent (5%) of the selling price of qualifying agricultural assets, subject to:

A twenty-five thousand dollar ($25,000) cap for each taxable year of the selling farmer;

A one hundred thousand dollar ($100,000) lifetime cap for each selling farmer; and

A proration by the authority based on the overall cap shared between the Small Business Tax Credit Program and the Selling Farmer Tax Credit Program cap of three million dollars ($3,000,000) under KRS 154.60-020.

The tax credit allowed in subsection (4) of this section may be claimed under KRS 141.3841.

In order to be eligible to receive approval for a tax credit, a selling farmer shall, at a minimum:

a.

Be registered with the Kentucky Secretary of State; and
(a) 1. a.

Be registered with the Kentucky Secretary of State; and

If not required to be registered with the Kentucky Secretary of State, be a resident of Kentucky;

Prior to a sale of agricultural assets, be a small business with fifty (50) or fewer full-time employees and be the sole legal owner of agricultural assets sold to a beginning farmer;

Not be a farm equipment dealer, livestock dealer, or similar entity primarily engaged in the business of selling agricultural assets for profit and not engaged in farming as a primary business activity;

Not be a bank or any other similar lending or financial institution;

Not be:

An owner, partner, member, shareholder, or trustee;

A spouse of an owner, partner, member, shareholder, or trustee;

An immediate family member of any of the owners, partners, members, shareholders, or trustees;

Demonstrate management and operation of real and personal property for the production of a farm product;
(f) 1.

Demonstrate management and operation of real and personal property for the production of a farm product;

Execute and effectuate a purchase contract to sell agricultural land with a beginning farmer for an amount evidenced by an appraisal; and

Sell, convey, and transfer ownership of related agricultural assets to a beginning farmer.

In order for the selling farmer to qualify for the tax credit, a beginning farmer shall, at a minimum:

a.

Be registered with the Kentucky Secretary of State; and
(a) 1. a.

Be registered with the Kentucky Secretary of State; and

If not required to be registered with the Kentucky Secretary of State, be a resident of Kentucky;

Possess all licenses, registrations, and experience needed to legally operate a farming operation within the jurisdiction for the agricultural land purchased from a selling farmer;

Not previously have held an ownership interest in agricultural land used for a farming operation for a period exceeding ten (10) years prior to entering into an agreement to purchase agricultural assets from a selling farmer;

Not have an ownership interest in any of the agricultural assets included in the transaction with the selling farmer; and

Provide a majority of the management, and materially participate in the operation of a for-profit farming operation located in Kentucky and purchased from a selling farmer, with the intent to continue a for-profit farming operation on the purchased agricultural land for a minimum of five (5) years after the sale date.

The selling farmer shall submit an application after consummation of the sale, transfer of title, and conveyance of agricultural assets together with all information necessary for the authority to determine eligibility for the tax credit.

An application for the selling farmer tax credit shall contain, at a minimum, information about the:

Selling farmer and purchasing beginning farmer eligibility;

Purchase contract and closing statement;

Documentation, such as a deed, title conveyance for the transfer of assets, including verification of Kentucky residency; and

Any other information the authority may require to determine eligibility for the credit.

For each approved application, the authority shall transmit to the Department of Revenue sufficient information about the selling farmer to ensure compliance with this section and KRS 141.3841, including the amount of approved tax credit allowed to the selling farmer.

Beginning January 1, 2020, the authority may approve selling farmer tax credits.

b.
Be in good standing with the Kentucky Secretary of State; or

of the beginning farmer to whom the selling farmer is seeking to sell agricultural assets;

b.
Be in good standing with the Kentucky Secretary of State; or

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 172, § 7, effective March 26, 2019; 2020 ch. 91, § 18, effective April 15, 2020.